src/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON  AANE_LOAN
    +N+Err/Orth:n  X_NIEJTE ; ! banane
                   +N:an X_NIEJTE ; ! ikke les
 +N+Cmp/SgNom+Use/NG:n  R      ;

LEXICON  AADE_LOAN
                      +N:ad X_NIEJTE ; ! ikke les
              +N+Err/Orth:d  X_NIEJTE ; ! ikke les
 +N+Cmp/SgNom+Dial/-NOR+Use/NG:d  R      ; !SW
  +N+Cmp/SgNom+Dial/-SW+Use/NG:de R      ; !NOR


LEXICON EEME_LOAN
    +N+Err/Orth:m  X_NIEJTE ; ! nasjovnale
                   +N:em X_NIEJTE ; ! ikke les
 +N+Cmp/SgNom+Use/NG:m  R      ;

LEXICON GRAMME_LOAN
                   +N:m X_NIEJTE ; ! ikke les
           +N+Err/Orth:  X_NIEJTE ;
 +N+Cmp/SgNom+Use/NG:  R      ;

LEXICON  OVSE_LOAN ! ikke les
                   +N:vs X_NIEJTE ; !sellulovse
           +N+Err/Orth:s  X_NIEJTE ; !sellulose
 +N+Cmp/SgNom+Use/NG:se R      ;



LEXICON NIEJTE
+N+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth: FINAL1 ;
+N: X_NIEJTE ;

LEXICON X_NIEJTE
 +Sg: NIEJTESGNOM ;
 +Sg: NIEJTESGOBL ;
 +Pl: NIEJTE_PL   ;
      NIEJTEREST  ;


LEXICON NIEJTEOBL ! This for reference from A sublexica !Lene: innkommentert pga nouns-oahpa
 +Sg: NIEJTESGadjOBL ;
 +Pl: NIEJTE_PL      ;
      EVEN_ESS       ;
      NIEJTE_CMPND   ;

LEXICON NIEJTESGadjOBL !adj continued... !Lene: innkommentert pga nouns-oahpa

        +Nom+PxSg1+Err/Orth:%>eme     FINAL1 ;
        +Nom+PxSg2+Err/Orth:%>edh     FINAL1 ;
        +Nom+PxSg3+Err/Orth:e%>se     FINAL1 ;
                       +Acc:e%>m       FINAL1 ;
        +Acc+PxSg1+Err/Orth:%>eme     FINAL1 ;
        +Acc+PxSg1+Err/Orth:%>emem    FINAL1 ;
        +Acc+PxSg2+Err/Orth:%>emdh    FINAL1 ;
        +Acc+PxSg3+Err/Orth:e%>mse    FINAL1 ;
                       +Gen:e%>n       FINAL1 ;
        +Gen+PxSg1+Err/Orth:%>ene     FINAL1 ;
                       +Ill:e%>se      FINAL1 ;
        +Ill+PxSg1+Err/Orth:%>esanne  FINAL1 ;
        +Ill+PxSg2+Err/Orth:%>esadth  FINAL1 ;
                       +Ine:e%>sne     FINAL1 ;
                       +Ela:e%>ste     FINAL1 ;
        +Ela+PxSg1+Err/Orth:%>estanne FINAL1 ;
        +Ela+PxSg2+Err/Orth:%>estadth FINAL1 ;
                       +Com:%>ine      FINAL1 ;
        +Com+PxSg2+Err/Orth:%>enadth  FINAL1 ;


LEXICON NIEJTE_SG
!! !!Inflection for NIEJTE_SG nouns: lexicon @LEXNAME@
! -------------------------------------------------------
!
!! Short descrioption of this lexicon, and its purpose.
!
   NIEJTESGNOM ;
   NIEJTESGOBL ;

LEXICON NIEJTESGNOM
 +Nom:e FINAL1 ;

LEXICON NIEJTESGOBL
        +Nom+PxSg1:%>eme     FINAL1 ;
        +Nom+PxSg2:%>edh     FINAL1 ;
        +Nom+PxSg3:e%>se     FINAL1 ;
        +Nom+PxSg3:e%>be     FINAL1 ;  ! som gaamege     
              +Acc:e%>m      FINAL1 ;
        +Acc+PxSg1:%>eme     FINAL1 ;
 +Acc+PxSg1+Use/NG:%>emem    FINAL1 ;
        +Acc+PxSg2:%>emdh    FINAL1 ;
        +Acc+PxSg3:e%>mse    FINAL1 ;
        +Acc+PxSg3:e%>bem    FINAL1 ;! gaamegem
              +Gen:e%>n      FINAL1 ;
        +Gen+PxSg1:%>ene     FINAL1 ;
        +Gen+PxSg2:%>edh     FINAL1 ;
        +Gen+PxSg3:e%>ben    FINAL1 ; ! gaamegen
              +Ill:e%>se     FINAL1 ;
        +Ill+PxSg1:%>esanne  FINAL1 ;
        +Ill+PxSg2:%>esadth  FINAL1 ;
        +Ill+PxSg3:%>ebasse  FINAL1 ;! gaamegasse
              +Ine:e%>sne    FINAL1 ;
              +Ela:e%>ste    FINAL1 ;     
     +Ine+Err/Orth:isnie     FINAL1 ;
     +Ill+PxSg3:%>ebisnie    FINAL1 ;! gaamegisnie
     +Ela+Err/Orth:istie     FINAL1 ;  
     +Ela+PxSg3:%>ebistie    FINAL1 ; ! gaamegistie 
        +Ela+PxSg1:%>estanne FINAL1 ;
 +Ela+PxSg1+Use/NG:%>estadth FINAL1 ;
              +Com:%>ine     FINAL1 ;
        +Com+PxSg2:%>enadth  FINAL1 ;
        +Com+PxSg3:%>ebinie  FINAL1 ; ! gaameginie
        +Ess+PxSg3:%>ebinie  FINAL1 ; ! gaameginie


LEXICON NIEJTE_PL
         +Nom:%>h        FINAL1 ;
+Nom+Err/Orth:%>eh       FINAL1 ; ! do not generate doubleform
         +Acc:%>ide      FINAL1 ;
         +Gen:%>i        FINAL1 ;
+Gen+Err/Orth:%>ij       FINAL1 ;
         +Ill:%>ide      FINAL1 ;
         +Ine:%>ine      FINAL1 ;
         +Ela:%>ijste    FINAL1 ;
         +Com:%>igujmie  FINAL1 ;
+Com+Err/Orth:%>ijgujmie FINAL1 ;
+Com+Err/Orth:%>igyjmie  FINAL1 ;

LEXICON NIEJTEREST
   EVEN_ESS     ;
   NIEJTE_CMPND ;
   NIEJTE_DER   ;

LEXICON NIEJTE_CMPND
 +Cmp/SgNom:e    R ;
 +Cmp/SgGen:e%>n R ;
 +Cmp/PlGen:%>i  R ;

LEXICON NIEJTE_DER
         +Der1+Der/Dimin+N:e%»tj GÅATETJE ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Err/Orth:etj  GÅATETJE ;
             +Der2+Der/Car:eht   hts_HTS_ODDNOCOMP ;


LEXICON NIEJTE_COMP
            NIEJTE   ;
 +N+Der/A:e EVENCOMP ;

LEXICON AARJEL_COMP
  +N+Der/A:  EVENCOMP ;
 +N+Sg+Nom:l FINAL1   ;
 +N+Cmp/SgNom:l R   ;


!  LEXICON MAAKE !!= @CODE@ Only for "relatives"
!  !! The __@LEXNAME@__ lexicon is used for SUBSTANTIVE_RELATIVES wwhich often has Px.
!     +N+Der1+Der/Rec+N:e     LAAHKOEH_EVEN ;
!                 +N+Sg:      NIEJTE_SG     ;
!                 +N+Pl:      NIEJTE_PL     ;
!                    +N:      EVEN_ESS      ;
!           +N+Cmp/SgNom:e     R             ;
!           +N+Cmp/SgGen:e%>n  R             ;
!           +N+Cmp/PlGen:%>i   R             ;
!   +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N:e%»tj GÅATETJE      ;

!!€gt-norm: vïelle # Even-syllable test
!!€ vïelle:               vïelle+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ vïellese:	         vïelle+N+Sg+Ill
!!€ vïelline:            vïelle+N+Sg+Com
!!€ vïelletje:	         vïelle+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ vïelletjasse:	     vïelle+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Ill
!!€ vïellemem:	         vïelle+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1
!!€ vïelleme:	         vïelle+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1
!!€ vïellemdh:	         vïelle+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg2
!!€ vïellese:	         vïelle+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3
!!€ vïellebe:	         vïelle+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3

LEXICON ÅERPIENADTJH ! - plural noun
                  +N+Cmp/SgNom:e                R         ;
                  +N+Cmp/PlGen:%>i              R         ;
                    +N+Pl+Nom:%>h              FINAL1    ;
             +N+Pl+Nom+Use/NG:%>eh             FINAL1    ;
                    +N+Pl+Acc:%>ide            FINAL1    ;
                    +N+Pl+Gen:%>               IGENSUFF  ;
                    +N+Pl+Ill:%>ide            FINAL1    ;
                    +N+Pl+Ine:%>ine            FINAL1    ;
                    +N+Pl+Ela:%>ijste          FINAL1    ;
                    +N+Pl+Com:%>igujmie        FINAL1    ;
            +N+Pl+Com+Err/Orth:%>igyjmie        FINAL1    ;
                       +N+Ess:%>ine            FINAL1    ;
       +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl:e%»tj            N_ODD_PL  ;
          +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N:e%»tj            N_ODD_ESS ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Cmp/SgNom:e%»tje           R         ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Cmp/PlGen:e%»tj%>%^DISIMPi R         ;
