src/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON HyphNouns
pc-programme+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:pc-pro^gram GRAMME_LOAN ;
LEXICON NounPx ! 
mïevredahke+Sem/Dummytag:mïevredahk NIEJTE ;
aerogramme+Sem/Dummytag:aero^gram GRAMME_LOAN ;
aidsprobleeme+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:aids#pro^ble EEME_LOAN ;
amerikaane+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:amerika AANE_LOAN ;
anorgaane+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:anorga AANE_LOAN ;
apartheidsysteeme+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:apartheid#syste EEME_LOAN ;
asbestovse+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:asbesto OVSE_LOAN ;
ballaade+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:balla AADE_LOAN ;
balustraade+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:balustra AADE_LOAN ;
banaane+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:bana AANE_LOAN ;
basiliske+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:basilisk NIEJTE ;
bhutaane+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:bhuta AANE_LOAN ;
bååtje+Sem/Dummytag:bååtj NIEJTE ;
daajh+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:daaj ÅERPIENADTJH ;
dataprogramme+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:data#pro^gram GRAMME_LOAN ;
datasysteeme+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:data#syste EEME_LOAN ;
diagnovse+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:dia^gno OVSE_LOAN ;
drïektediagramme+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:drïekte#dia^gram GRAMME_LOAN ;
ekosysteeme+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:eko#syste EEME_LOAN ;
håålenasse+Sem/Dummytag:håålenass NIEJTE ;
fasaade+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:fasa AADE_LOAN ;
finanssysteeme+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:finans#syste EEME_LOAN ;
furunkulovse+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:furunkulo OVSE_LOAN ;
geasastahkh+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:geasastahk ÅERPIENADTJH ;
germaane+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:germa AANE_LOAN ;
goerpe+Sem/Dummytag:goerp NIEJTE ;
halitovse+Sem/Dummytag:halito OVSE_LOAN ;
hologramme+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:holo^gram GRAMME_LOAN ;
vueperasse+Sem/Dummytag:vueperass NIEJTE ;
jurysysteeme+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:jury#syste EEME_LOAN ;
jïekth+Sem/Dummytag:jïekt ÅERPIENADTJH ;
kanonaade+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:kanona AADE_LOAN ;
kardaane+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:karda AANE_LOAN ;
ketovse+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:keto OVSE_LOAN ;
kodetelegramme+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:kode#tele^gram GRAMME_LOAN ;
kollektivsysteeme+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:kollektiv#syste EEME_LOAN ;
kolonnaade+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:kolonna AADE_LOAN ;
krodth+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:krodt ÅERPIENADTJH ;
krohth+Sem/Dummytag:kroht ÅERPIENADTJH ;
kruanesaath+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:kruanes#aat ÅERPIENADTJH ;
kryptogamme+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:kryptogam GRAMME_LOAN ;
kubaane+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:kuba AANE_LOAN ;
kåale+Sem/Dummytag:kåal NIEJTE ;
laeviehkadtjh+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:laeviehkadtj ÅERPIENADTJH ;
luhteraane+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:luhtera AANE_LOAN ;
lymfesysteeme+Sem/Dummytag:lymfe#syste EEME_LOAN ;
maltovse+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:malto OVSE_LOAN ;
marmelaade+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:marmela AADE_LOAN ;
meksikaane+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:meksika AANE_LOAN ;
mitovse+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:mito OVSE_LOAN ;
mïere+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:mïer NIEJTE ;
nekrovse+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:nekro OVSE_LOAN ;
noerhte+Err/Orth+Sem/Dummytag:noerth NIEJTE_COMP ;
noerhte+Sem/Dummytag:noerht NIEJTE_COMP ; !noerhtebe, noerhtebasse, noerhtemes
nomaade+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:noma AADE_LOAN ;
oskillogramme+Err/Orth+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:oscillo^gram GRAMME_LOAN ;
osmovse+Sem/Dummytag:osmo OVSE_LOAN ;
paraade+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:para AADE_LOAN ;
pelikaane+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:pelika AANE_LOAN ;
permsysteeme+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:perm#syste EEME_LOAN ;
programme+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:pro^gram GRAMME_LOAN ;
promenaade+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:promena AADE_LOAN ;
demokraate+Sem/Dummytag:demokraat NIEJTE ;  
psykovse+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:psyko OVSE_LOAN ;
puritaane+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:purita AANE_LOAN ;
remulaade+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:remula AADE_LOAN ;
retursysteeme+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:retur#syste EEME_LOAN ;
romaane+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:roma AANE_LOAN ;
rulaade+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:rula AADE_LOAN ;
sentigramme+Err/Orth+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:centi^gram GRAMME_LOAN ;
silursysteeme+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:silur#syste EEME_LOAN ;
sjignovne+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:sjignovn NIEJTE ;
sjokolaade+Err/Orth+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:sjokovla AADE_LOAN ;
sjysnjlassjh+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:sjysnjlassj ÅERPIENADTJH ;
skrofulovse+Sem/Dummytag:skrofulo OVSE_LOAN ;
somperemïerhke+Sem/Dummytag:somperemïerhk NIEJTE ;
sulfittsellulovse+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:sulfitt#sellulo OVSE_LOAN ;
sysngeladtjh+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:sysngeladtj ÅERPIENADTJH ;
sysngelasjh+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:sysngelasj ÅERPIENADTJH ;
telefonprogramme+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:telefon#pro^gram GRAMME_LOAN ;
testsysteeme+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:test#syste EEME_LOAN ;
tiraade+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:tira AADE_LOAN ;
tjoehpe+Sem/Dummytag:tjoehp NIEJTE ;
trombovse+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:trombo OVSE_LOAN ;
vektordiagramme+Sem/Dummytag:vektordia^gram GRAMME_LOAN ;
visumprobleeme+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:visum#pro^ble EEME_LOAN ;
zoonovse+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:zo^ono OVSE_LOAN ;
åarjel+Sem/Dummytag:åarje AARJEL_COMP ; ! Only in compounds?
åejvieladtjh+Sem/Dummytag:åejvieladtj ÅERPIENADTJH ;
ööhpehtimmieprogramme+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:ööhpehtimmie#pro^gram GRAMME_LOAN ;
åejviefaage+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:åejvie#faag NIEJTE ;
vaaksjomeorgaane+Sem/Dummytag:vaaksjome#orga AANE_LOAN ;
byjreskrodth+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:byjres#krodt ÅERPIENADTJH ;
